Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Chapter 85. Needy Veterans

§ 1601.
Aid to needy veterans.

The monies annually available for the purposes of this chapter, or so much thereof as may be necessary, shall be expended under the supervision of the Vermont Office of Veterans’ Affairs at the direction of the Adjutant General. The Office of Veterans’ Affairs shall disburse such funds, or such part thereof as may be necessary, in aiding, caring for, and educating needy veterans and needy persons who are legal dependents of veterans. The Office of Veterans’ Affairs shall award funds to applicants approved for assistance based on criteria approved by the Adjutant General. Monetary assistance will be given only to applicants who would not be better served by other State, federal, or private assistance programs. The Adjutant General shall determine conditions for eligibility and will ensure that the program is managed to the limit imposed by the available funding. The Office of Veterans’ Affairs shall submit an annual report to the Adjutant General on all fund activities at the end of each fiscal year. In addition, the Adjutant General will review all fund expenditures at least once per fiscal year.

The Office of Veterans’ Affairs shall develop application and operating procedures for the fund, which must be approved by the Office of the Adjutant General. Any deviation from the application and operating procedures shall be approved by the Adjutant General. The application and operating procedures shall be available for review by applicants, service providers, and others that may have an interest in the fund.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 328

(Adj. Sess.), § 8(a), (b);

1983, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 5(b);

2001, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. May 28, 2002.

§§ 1602-1604.
Repealed. 2001, No. 116 (Adj. Sess.), § 9.

§ 1605.
Veteran education.

The Office of Veterans’ Affairs may use some, none, or all of the funds to educate needy veterans about programs and benefits that will provide more permanent solutions to their financial situation. Any use of funds for veteran education or program support shall be approved in advance by the Adjutant General.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. May 28, 2002.